Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-147
Construction fund; deposit with county treasurer; when authorized; disbursement.

The board may draw from time to time from the construction fund, and deposit it in the county treasury of the county where the office of the board is situated, any sum in excess of the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars. The county treasurer is hereby authorized and required to receive and receipt for the same, and place the same to the credit of the district, and he shall be responsible upon his official bond for the safekeeping and disbursement of the same, as provided in sections 46-147 and 46-148. He shall pay out the same, or any part thereof, to the treasurer of the district only, and upon the order of the board, signed by the president and attested by the secretary.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 23, p. 286;

Laws 1897, c. 86, § 6, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 3481;

Laws 1917, c. 84, § 1, p. 198;

C.S.1922, § 2881;

Laws 1923, c. 97, § 3, p. 251;

Laws 1929, c. 131, § 1, p. 482;

C.S.1929, § 46-126;

R.S.1943, § 46-147.